Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 4
FUNDING - NONSTATE ASSISTED PLANS

31-30.5-401. Sources of revenue for fund.

Except for state-assisted old hire police officers' and firefighters' pension plans and those affiliated with the fire and police pension association pursuant to section 31-31-701, each old hire pension fund may consist of:

All moneys that may be given to such board or fund by any person for the use and purpose for which such fund is created. Such board may take, by gift, grant, devise, or bequest, any money, personal property, or real estate, or interest therein, as trustees for the uses and purposes for which the fund is created;

All moneys, fees, rewards, or emoluments of every nature and description that may be paid or given to said fund;

All moneys derived from employer and member contributions, as provided for in sections 31-30.5-402 and 31-30.5-403.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 876, § 1, effective May 23.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-406.

31-30.5-402. Municipalities under fifty thousand - limit of contributions to old hire police officers' pension plans.

There is granted to municipalities in this state having less than fifty thousand population the power to pay from the general funds of their respective municipalities into the old hire police officers' pension fund of their respective municipalities such sum monthly as shall not exceed five percent of the monthly salaries of the total active old hire members in the police department of their respective municipalities.

In such municipalities as make contributions from general funds into the old hire police officers' pension fund of their respective municipalities pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the active old hire members of such police department shall contribute monthly, from their respective monthly salaries, into the municipality's old hire police officers' pension fund identical percentages of their respective monthly salaries so that the contribution of the active old hire members of the police department as a whole matches the contribution of the municipality.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 876, § 1, effective May 23.

Editor's note:

Provisions of this section were formerly numbered as §§ 31-30-319 and 31-30-320.

31-30.5-403. Employers under one hundred thousand - limit of contributions to old hire firefighter pension plans.

There may be levied and set apart by the governing body of each municipality having a population of less than one hundred thousand, by the board of directors of each fire protection district, or by the board of a county improvement district, a tax for the year 1969 and each year thereafter of not more than one mill on the taxable property in such municipality, fire protection district, or county improvement district, the proceeds thereof to be credited to the old hire firefighters' pension fund of each such municipality, fire protection district, or county improvement district.

Any municipality, fire protection district, or county improvement district having less than one hundred thousand population and having a paid fire department shall levy an assessment on the active old hire members in an amount not to exceed six percent of their monthly salaries and, as a minimum amount, shall match the moneys derived therefrom by an equal contribution from the municipality, fire protection district, or county improvement district by use of the levy provided for in subsection (1) of this section, or the proper governing body shall appropriate said sum out of the general revenues of the municipality, fire protection district, or county improvement district.

Any municipality having less than one hundred thousand population and having a paid and volunteer fire department or any fire protection district or county improvement district having a paid and volunteer fire department shall assess the paid old hire members of such department in an amount not to exceed six percent of their monthly salaries and, as a minimum amount, shall match the moneys derived therefrom by an equal contribution from the municipality, fire protection district, or county improvement district by use of the levy provided for in subsection (1) of this section. Said sum shall be segregated by the municipal treasurer, the treasurer of the district board of directors, or the treasurer of the county improvement district, as the case may be, and shall be used for the payment of pensions to the paid old hire members of said departments and their surviving spouses and orphans, as otherwise provided for in this article, but, so long as there are volunteer members in said department, the present old hire pension fund, if derived from state allocations, shall continue to be maintained for the benefit of all members of said department, paid old hire members and volunteers alike, under such rules as the board determines to be equitable.

A paid firefighter is any firefighter whose main source of income is derived from service on a fire department. All other firefighters who render service to a fire department are volunteer firefighters.

If the total moneys allocated to an old hire firefighters' pension fund by a municipality, fire protection district, or county improvement district are, in the opinion of the board of such municipality, fire protection district, or county improvement district, inadequate to sustain a proper fund for retirement or for the other purposes of the fund under this article, such board may consolidate its old hire fund with the old hire fund of another municipality, fire protection district, or county improvement district, and such consolidated funds shall thereafter be administered as a single fund. Such consolidation of funds may be made under such conditions and in conformity with such terms as are mutually agreed to by the boards of the consolidating single funds, consistent with the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 877, § 1, effective May 23.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-405.

31-30.5-404. Plans affiliated with the fire and police pension association.

Notwithstanding any provision of this part 4 to the contrary, an employer that affiliates its old hire police officers' or firefighters' pension fund with the fire and police pension association pursuant to section 31-31-701 and that is not receiving state contributions under part 3 of this article shall annually contribute an amount approved by the board of directors of the association, upon the advice of its actuary, sufficient to pay the normal cost plus amortize the unfunded past service liability attributed to old hire members, over a period not to exceed the lesser of twenty years or the number of years equal to the average remaining life expectancy of the pension fund's members.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 878, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-227), ch. 125, p. 543, § 4, effective April 16.